Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-206
Amendments; how enrolled and numbered; duties of Secretary of State.

Whenever any amendments to the Constitution shall have been proposed to and adopted by the electors of this state, as provided in sections 49-201 to 49-205, the same shall be enrolled and numbered in the order of time in which they may be adopted, and preserved by the Secretary of State among the public records of his office.

Laws 1877, § 6, p. 115;

R.S.1913, § 3703;

C.S.1922, § 3091;

C.S.1929, § 49-206;

R.S.1943, § 49-206.